Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Electricians and Electrical Contractors

227A.010.
Definitions for KRS 227A.010 to 227A.140.

As used in KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authorized local licensing program” means any city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated local government electrician and electrical contractor licensing program established by local ordinance for the purpose of licensing electrical workers. “Authorized local licensing program” shall include a licensing program established through a cooperative agreement between two (2) or more counties;

“Department” means the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;

“Electrical” pertains to the installation, alteration, or repair of wires and conduits for the purpose of transmitting electricity, and the installation of fixtures and equipment in connection therewith;

“Electrical contractor” means any licensed individual, partnership, or corporation that is licensed to engage in, offers to engage in, or advertises or holds itself out to be qualified to engage in designing, planning, superintending, contracting of, or assuming responsibility for the installation, alteration, or repair of any electrical system used for the purpose of furnishing heat, light, or power, and employs electrical workers to engage in this practice. If the electrical contractor is not a master electrician, the electrical contractor shall employ at least one (1) full-time master electrician; however, no master electrician shall act in this capacity for more than one (1) electrical contractor;

“Electrical system” means any electrical work subject to standards provided within the National Electrical Code as adopted in the Uniform State Building Code, as promulgated by the department;

“Electrician” means any person licensed by the department who is employed by an electrical contractor and is engaged in the construction, alteration, or repair of any electrical system used for the purpose of furnishing heat, light, or power;

“Maintenance worker or maintenance engineer” means a person who is a regular, bona fide employee or agent of a property owner, property lessor, property management company, or firm that is not in the electrical business but has jurisdiction over the property where the routine maintenance of electrical systems is being performed;

“Master electrician” means any individual licensed to engage in, and assume responsible charge, supervision, or direction of an electrician engaged in the construction, installation, alteration, or repair of any electrical system used to furnish heat, light, or power;

“Repair” means the reconstruction or renewal of any part of an existing building for the purpose of its maintenance; and

“Routine maintenance of electrical systems” means the routine and periodic servicing of electrical systems, including cleaning, inspecting, and making adjustments to ensure the proper operation and the removal or replacement of component parts. “Routine maintenance of electrical systems” does not include the installation of complete electrical systems.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 119, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 81, § 2, effective April 6, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 429, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 105, § 8, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 169, § 87, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/24/2003). Pursuant to
KRS

7.136

, the subsections in this section ( 2003 Ky. Acts ch. 119, sec. 1) have been renumbered.

227A.020.
Prohibitions — Local licensing programs.

A person who is not licensed as an electrical contractor shall not represent himself or herself to the public as an electrical contractor or use any terms, titles, or abbreviations which express or imply that the person is a licensed electrical contractor.

A person who is not licensed as a master electrician shall not represent himself or herself to the public as a master electrician or use any terms, titles, or abbreviations which express or imply that the person is a licensed master electrician.

A person who is not licensed as an electrician shall not represent himself or herself to the public as an electrician or use any terms, titles, or abbreviations which express or imply that the person is a licensed electrician.

A person who is not licensed as an electrical contractor, electrician, or master electrician shall not engage in any activities or perform any of the duties usually performed by an electrical contractor, electrician, or master electrician unless the unlicensed person is under the direct supervision of a licensed electrician or master electrician who is present on the site where the work is being performed.

An authorized local licensing program in existence on June 24, 2003, may contract with the department to become an agent of the department for purposes of the issuance and renewal of licenses issued pursuant to KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

. The department may also contract with local governments that want to become authorized licensing programs.

KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall supersede all ordinances or regulations regulating electricians, master electricians, and electrical contractors of any city, county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government. This provision shall not affect city, county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government regulations relating to zoning requirements or occupational payroll taxes pertaining to electricians, master electricians, and electrical contractors.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 119, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 24, § 430, effective July 15, 2010.

227A.030.
Limitations on applicability of KRS 227A.010 to 227A.140.

The provisions of KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall not apply to installations under the exclusive control of electric utilities for the purpose of communication, metering, or for the generation, control, transformation, transmission, and distribution of electric energy located in buildings used exclusively by utilities for those purposes or located outdoors on property owned or leased by the utility or on public highways, streets, or roads, or outdoors by established rights on private property.

Nothing in KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall require that a maintenance worker or maintenance engineer performing routine maintenance of electrical systems be licensed.

Nothing in KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall prohibit or interfere with the ability of a homeowner or farmer to install or repair electrical wiring on his or her real property.

Nothing in KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall require that a retailer or its agent engaged in making installations of an appliance purchased at a retail establishment be licensed.

Nothing in KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall be construed to require persons making installations exempt by KRS

227.460

to be licensed or to work for a licensed person.

Nothing in KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall preclude the use of unlicensed, nonresident electricians in temporary, emergency, or industrial shutdown situations. Those unlicensed, nonresident electricians shall apply for an electrician’s license or a master electrician’s license after they are employed and engaged in electrical work in the Commonwealth of Kentucky for a period of ten (10) days. No unlicensed, nonresident electrician shall be employed or engaged in electrical work in the Commonwealth of Kentucky for a total of more than thirty (30) days in any calendar year without applying for an electrician’s license or a master electrician’s license. The license shall be obtained by the temporary, unlicensed, nonresident electricians within sixty (60) days of securing employment.

Nothing in KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall apply to a person performing work at a surface or underground coal mine or at a coal preparation plant.

Nothing in KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall apply to a person performing work for a telecommunications company for which the voltage is fifty (50) volts or less.

Nothing in KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall prohibit a factory-authorized representative from the installation, maintenance, or service of a medical equipment device. This exemption does not include work providing electrical feeds into the power distribution unit or installation of conduits and raceways. This exemption covers only those factory engineers or third-party service companies with equivalent training who are qualified to perform such service.

Nothing in KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall apply to low-voltage, power-limited installations for control or coordination of interconnected devices separated from a power source by a Class 2 or Class 3 transformer installed by a person licensed as:

A master or journeyman heating, ventilation, and air conditioning technician employed by a licensed HVAC contractor pursuant to KRS

198B.658

;

A fire protection sprinkler contractor pursuant to KRS

198B.560

;

A manufactured housing dealer or certified installer pursuant to KRS

227.610

;

A boiler mechanic pursuant to KRS

236.210

;

A master or journeyman plumber pursuant to KRS

318.030

;

An onsite sewage disposal system installer pursuant to KRS

211.357

; or

An electrician or master electrician employed by an electrical contractor pursuant to KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

.

The provisions of KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall not apply to work performed at industrial manufacturing facilities or natural gas pipeline facilities by employees of those facilities.

Notwithstanding subsection (6) of this section, KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall not apply to a disaster response employee as defined in KRS

141.010

who is licensed as an electrician or master electrician in another state.

KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall not apply to a disaster response business as defined in KRS

141.010

that is licensed as an electrical contractor in another state.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 119, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 81, § 5, effective April 6, 2004; 2005, ch. 41, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 24, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 83, § 5, effective July 12, 2006; 2021 ch. 31, § 9, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2006). 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 83, sec. 6, provides that the Act, which included an amendment to this statute, shall be known and may be cited as “Isaac’s Act.”

227A.040.
Powers and duties of department.

The department shall administer and enforce KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

and shall evaluate the qualifications of applicants for licensure.

The department may issue subpoenas, examine witnesses, pay appropriate witness fees, administer oaths, and investigate allegations of practices violating KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

or the administrative regulations promulgated under KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

and KRS Chapter 13A.

The department shall conduct hearings under KRS Chapter 13B and keep records and minutes necessary to carry out the functions of KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

.

The department shall evaluate the qualifications of applicants and issue licenses to qualified candidates.

The department shall renew licenses.

The department may:

Refuse to issue or renew a license;

Suspend or revoke a license;

Impose supervisory or probationary conditions upon a licensee;

Impose administrative disciplinary fines;

Issue written reprimands or admonishments; and

Take any combination of the actions permitted in this subsection.

The department may seek injunctive relief in the Circuit Court of Franklin County, in the county in which the violation occurred, or in the county where the business of the accused is located to stop any unlawful practice in KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder. The department may also seek injunctive relief for unlicensed persons who inappropriately use the title “electrical contractor,” “electrician,” or “master electrician.”

The department, with comments from the Housing, Buildings and Construction Advisory Committee if required by KRS 198B.030(8), may promulgate administrative regulations to create a code of ethics and procedures governing the licensure of electrical contractors, electricians, and master electricians.

The department may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states having licensure, certification, or registration qualifications and requirements substantially equal to those of this state.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 119, § 4, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 256, § 7, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 431, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 100, § 18, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 169, § 88, effective June 29, 2017.

227A.050.
Fees — Revolving fund.

All fees and other moneys received by the department under the provisions of KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of a revolving fund for use by the department in administering the provisions of KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

.

No part of this revolving fund shall revert to the general funds of the Commonwealth.

An authorized local licensing program under KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall negotiate with the department the amount of the fees to be retained by the authorized local licensing program.

Funds for the initial administration of KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

, following June 24, 2003, and to the extent fee income is insufficient to meet actual costs as determined by the chief budget officer for the department, shall be borrowed from surplus trust and agency accounts of the department and repaid without interest over no more than the succeeding two (2) fiscal years.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 119, § 5, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 24, § 432, effective July 15, 2010.

227A.060.
Qualifications for licensure — Provisional license.

The department shall issue a license as an “electrical contractor” to an applicant who meets the following requirements:

Has paid to the department the application fee not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) and the appropriate examination fee, which shall not exceed the actual cost of examination;

Has achieved a passing score, as set by the department, on all portions of the examination required by the department. The department shall promulgate administrative regulations to specify who shall take the examination if the applicant is a business entity; and

Has submitted proof that he or she has complied with workers’ compensation and unemployment insurance laws and administrative regulations and has obtained a general liability insurance policy of not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

The department shall issue a license as a “master electrician” to an applicant who meets the following requirements:

Has paid to the department the application fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) and the appropriate examination fee not to exceed the actual cost of the examination;

Has completed:

Six (6) years of verifiable experience in the electrical trade since his or her sixteenth birthday; and

A training course in electrical work, acceptable to the department, or an additional two (2) years of verifiable experience in the electrical trade; or

Five (5) years of verifiable experience in the electrical trade since his or her sixteenth birthday; and

An associate’s degree or diploma program in electrical technology at a college within the Kentucky Community and Technical College System after 1998; and

Has achieved a passing score, as set by the department, on all portions of the examination required by the department.

The department shall issue a license as an “electrician” to an applicant who meets the following requirements:

Has paid to the department the application fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50) and the appropriate examination fee not to exceed the actual cost of the examination administered by the department;

Has completed:

Two (2) years of verifiable experience in the electrical trade since his or her sixteenth birthday; and

A training course in electrical work, acceptable to the department;

Two (2) years of a minimum four (4) year training course in electrical work, acceptable to the department, and shall complete the remaining years of that training course within four (4) years of obtaining the electrician license, or the electrician license shall be revoked; or

An additional two (2) years of verifiable experience in the electrical trade; and

Has achieved a passing score, as set by the department, on all portions of the examination required and administered by the department.

The department shall issue a nonrenewable provisional license as an “electrician” to an applicant who:

Is a Kentucky resident; and

Has completed at least six (6) years of verifiable experience and has worked two thousand eighty (2,080) hours a year for those six (6) years in the electrical trade since the applicant’s sixteenth birthday.

A nonrenewable provisional license issued to an applicant under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be valid for a period not to exceed one (1) year from the date of issuance.

The department shall issue a license as an electrician to a provisional license holder who has, prior to the expiration of the one (1) year term of the provisional license:

Achieved a passing score on all portions of the examination required and administered by the department under subsection (3)(c) of this section;

Paid to the department the application fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50); and

Paid to the department the examination fee not to exceed the actual cost of the examination.

If a provisional license holder does not achieve a passing score on all portions of the examination required and administered under subsection (3)(c) of this section prior to the expiration of the one (1) year term of the provisional license, the provisional license shall expire and the provisional license holder shall be ineligible for any additional provisional licenses. Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent a former provisional license holder from acquiring an electrician’s license under subsection (3) of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 119, § 6, effective June 24, 2003; 2009, ch. 6, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 433, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 74, § 19, effective June 8, 2011; 2018 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2018).
2018 Ky. Acts ch. 186, sec. 2, provides: “This section shall apply to any person who became licensed between June 24, 2003, and July 15, 2004, through
KRS

227A.080

prior to that statute’s repeal on June 25, 2009, but whose license subsequently lapsed. That person may have his or her license reissued upon payment of a $100 fee and retaking the regular examination required by the department for that license within one year of the fee payment. A license shall not be reissued under this section after July 31, 2020.”

227A.070.
Licensure by endorsement.

Upon application to the department and payment of all applicable fees, the department shall license by endorsement an applicant who is registered, licensed, or certified in another state if the requirements for registration, licensing, or certification in the issuing state are substantially equal to the requirements for licensing in the Commonwealth of Kentucky and the applicant is in good standing in the issuing state. The department shall license an applicant by endorsement only if the issuing state extends similar reciprocity to Kentucky citizens licensed under KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 119, § 7, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 24, § 434, effective July 15, 2010.

227A.080.
Provisions for licensure before July 15, 2004. [Repealed.]

227A.090.
Examinations.

The department shall select and approve an examination to be used in determining the competency of persons to be licensed under KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

. Examinations selected and approved for each level of licensing shall be nationally recognized examinations which have been determined through proper validation techniques to measure successfully an individual’s competency to perform the licensed practice.

The department shall offer the examinations on a regularly scheduled basis in localities around the state. The department shall offer the examinations through any authorized local licensing program.

The department may contract with an outside entity or testing service for the administration of examinations required for licensure.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 119, § 9, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 24, § 435, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 89, effective June 29, 2017.

227A.100.
Fees — Application for renewal or reinstatement of license.

Each licensee licensed under the provisions of KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall annually, on or before the last day of the licensee’s birth month, pay to the department a renewal fee as established in administrative regulations promulgated by the department.

A sixty (60) day grace period shall be allowed after the anniversary date of the license during which time a licensee may continue to practice and may renew his or her license upon payment of the renewal fee plus a late renewal fee as promulgated by administrative regulation of the department.

A license not renewed before the end of the sixty (60) day grace period shall terminate based on the failure of the licensee to renew in a timely manner. Upon termination, the licensee is no longer eligible to practice in the Commonwealth.

After the sixty (60) day grace period, a former licensee with a terminated license may have the license reinstated upon payment of the renewal fee plus a reinstatement fee as promulgated by administrative regulation of the department. An applicant for reinstatement after termination of the license shall not be required to submit to any examination as a condition for reinstatement, if the reinstatement application is made within three (3) years from the date of termination.

A suspended license is subject to expiration and termination and shall be renewed as provided in this section. Renewal shall not entitle the licensee to engage in the practice until the suspension has ended or is otherwise removed by the department and the right to practice is restored by the department.

A revoked license is subject to expiration or termination but may not be renewed. If it is reinstated, the former licensee shall pay the reinstatement fee as promulgated by administrative regulations under subsection (4) of this section and the renewal fee as promulgated by administrative regulations under subsection (1) of this section.

The department shall require an applicant for renewal or reinstatement of a license to show evidence of completing at least six (6) hours of continuing education provided by the National Electrical Contractors Association, the Associated Builders and Contractors, the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers, the Associated General Contractors, the International Association of Electrical Inspectors, the Independent Electrical Contractors Association, the Kentucky Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction, or other provider of instruction approved by the department. The department shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the content of the programs and the qualifications of the providers.

The department shall require, where applicable, that an applicant for renewal or reinstatement of a license submit proof that the applicant has complied with workers’ compensation and unemployment insurance laws and regulations and has obtained a general liability insurance policy of not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

The department may, through the promulgation of administrative regulations:

Establish an inactive license for licensees who are not actively engaging in the electrical business but wish to maintain their license;

Reduce license and renewal fees for inactive licensees; and

Waive the requirements established in subsection (8) of this section for inactive licensees.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 119, § 10, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 81, § 3, effective April 6, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 436, effective July 15, 2010.

227A.110.
Disciplinary actions.

The department may, following a hearing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B, impose sanctions specified in KRS

227A.040

upon proof that the licensee has:

Misrepresented or concealed a material fact in obtaining a license, or in the reinstatement thereof;

Been incompetent or negligent in the practice of performing electrical work;

Failed to comply with an order issued by the department or an assurance of voluntary compliance; or

Violated any provisions of KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.

One (1) year from the date of a revocation, any former licensee whose license has been revoked may petition the department for reinstatement. The department shall investigate the petition and may reinstate the license upon a finding that the applicant has complied with any terms prescribed by the department and is again able to competently engage in the practice of performing electrical work.

At any time during the investigative or hearing processes, the department may enter into an agreed order or accept an assurance of voluntary compliance with the license holder which effectively deals with the complaint.

The department may reconsider, modify, or reverse its probations, suspensions, or other disciplinary actions.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 119, § 11, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 24, § 437, effective July 15, 2010.

227A.120.
Appeal of disciplinary action.

Any party aggrieved by a disciplinary action of the department may bring an action in the Circuit Court of Franklin County under the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 119, § 12, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 24, § 438, effective July 15, 2010.

227A.130.
Penalties for violation of KRS 227A.020.

Any person who violates or aids in the violation of any provision of KRS

227A.020

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or sentenced to jail for not less than ten (10) nor more than one hundred eighty (180) days, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 119, § 13, effective June 24, 2003.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

227A.140.
Effect of disassociation of licensee on electrical contractor or other business — Interim period for use of recently deceased licensee’s master electrician’s license.

A master electrician who ceases to be associated with the electrical contractor and is the representative by which the licensed electrical contractor qualifies shall immediately report his or her disassociation to the department or the authorized local licensing program. The master electrician shall be responsible for all work done under his or her license until the department or the authorized local licensing program is notified by the master electrician that he or she is no longer associated with the electrical contractor.

If the holder of any electrical license ceases to be a part of the business relying upon the holder’s license for its right to remain in business, the business shall employ a licensed person prior to the continuance of any business activity or within thirty (30) days, whichever comes first.

Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if a master electrician dies while a business was relying on his or her license for its right to remain in business, the department shall grant an interim time period of up to one hundred eighty (180) continuous calendar days to allow the business for which the master electrician worked to utilize the master electrician’s license to procure electrical permits for that business, provided that the business:

Effectuates and documents all necessary bonding and insurance policies required by this chapter; and

Ensures all bonding and insurance policies remain effective for the entirety of the interim time period.

A deceased master electrician’s license shall be terminated by the department at the end of the interim period.

Upon termination of the deceased master electrician’s license, an electrical contractor shall have an employee with a current and valid Kentucky master electrician’s license in order to procure permits and perform electrical work under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 119, § 14, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 24, § 439, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 22, § 7, effective July 14, 2018.

227A.150.
Limitation on applicability of KRS 227A.010 to 227A.140 to low-voltage installer certificate holder.

Nothing in KRS

227A.010

to

227A.140

shall apply to low-voltage, power-limited installations for control or coordination of interconnected devices separated from a power source by a Class 2 or Class 3 transformer installed by a low-voltage installer certificate holder. The department shall set the standards for experience and testing for issuance of a low-voltage installer certificate by administrative regulation and may charge a fee to be set by the department by administrative regulation but not to exceed the actual cost of issuance of the certificate.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 81, § 6, effective April 6, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 440, effective July 15, 2010.